District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-341

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 2, 24 DCR 3725
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-40, § 2(a), 28 DCR 3395
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-118, § 6(b), 31 DCR 4034
Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-220, § 2, 38 DCR 199
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-341.
1973 Ed., § 47-271.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 2-32, see Mayor’s Order 85-87, June 10, 1985.

Mayor's Orders

Amendment of Organization Order No. 112, establishing Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 84-31, February 9, 1984.

Amendment of delegation of authority under D.C. Law 2-32: See Mayor’s Order 85-168, October 4, 1985.